Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2838
Health care provider; unable to obtain coverage; apply to risk manager; decision; appeal.

(1) If, after diligent effort to obtain coverage, a health care provider has been declined by at least two insurers, the risk may forward his application to the risk manager together with evidence of the two declinations.

(2) If the risk manager declines to accept the risk, notice of declination, together with the reasons, shall be sent to the applicant and the director. The applicant shall have ten days from the date of notice by the risk manager to request review by the director. On appeal, the director shall review the decision of the risk manager and enter an appropriate order.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 38.